District of Columbia statutes.
38-841.04

Additional requirements.

(a)

Each public or public charter high school shall establish a 3-member Gender Equity Review Committee or identify at least 3 senior administrators to establish criteria for ensuring the gender equity in the school’s athletic program, evaluate the athletics program, and manage Title IX issues at the LEA. This grievance procedures and criteria shall be posted publicly on the school’s website.

(b)

An LEA shall develop grievance procedures that are made available upon request or to any person alleging a violation of Title IX in accordance with Title IX regulations.

(c)

An applicable school shall maintain Title IX records for a minimum of 10 years. The Title IX records shall be subject to review by the Mayor and shall include the following:

(1)

A Title IX Plan, which shall include a self-evaluation of the school’s entire athletic program based on the annual assurance of compliance required by this chapter and proposed plans and timetables, as appropriate, to ensure gender equity in the athletics program, including items such as practice times, facilities, coaching stipends, and athletic budgets;

(2)

A summary of Title IX complaints, including the resolution of each, for the current and previous 9 years;

(3)

A copy of the school’s grievance procedures; and

(4)

For public and public charter high schools, a list of members of the GERC or the 3 senior administrators serving in this capacity and their contact information.

Oct. 21, 2015, D.C. Law 21-29, § 5, 62 DCR 10884